Washington statutes.
RCW 43.03.300

Salaries of elected state officials—Legislative declaration—Purpose.

The legislature hereby declares it to be the policy of this state to base salaries of elected state officials on realistic standards in order that such officials may be paid according to the duties of their offices and so that citizens of the highest quality may be attracted to public service. It is the purpose of RCW 43.03.300 through 43.03.310 to effectuate this policy by creating a citizens' commission to establish proper salaries for such officials, thus removing political considerations in fixing the appropriateness of the amount of such salaries.

[ 1986 c 155 s 1.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—1986 c 155: "This act shall take effect on January 1, 1987, if the proposed amendment to Article XXVIII of the state Constitution establishing an exclusive process for changes in the salaries of members of the legislature and other elected state officials is validly submitted and is approved and ratified by the voters at a general election held in November, 1986. If such proposed amendment is not so submitted and approved and ratified, this act shall be null and void in its entirety." [ 1986 c 155 s 16.] 1986 House Joint Resolution No. 49 was approved at the November 1986 general election. See Article XXVIII, section 1 and Amendment 78 of the state Constitution.

Severability—1986 c 155: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1986 c 155 s 15.]